apertium-eng-hin.eng.dix
<pardef n="r/ing__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ings</l>      <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ang</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ung</l>       <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inging</l>    <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/eek__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eek</l>       <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eek</l>       <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eeks</l>      <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eeking</l>    <r>eek<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sh/ear__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ear</l>       <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ear</l>       <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ears</l>      <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eared</l>     <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eared</l>     <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>orn</l>       <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>earing</l>    <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sho/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eing</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/ink__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ink</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ink</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inks</l>      <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>unk</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>inked</l>     <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>unk</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>inked</l>     <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>unk</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inking</l>    <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
    <!-- Below is content of 2nd definition of st/ink__vblex -->

</pardef>

<pardef n="slid/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="br/eak__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eak</l>       <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eak</l>       <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eaks</l>      <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oke</l>       <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oken</l>      <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eaking</l>    <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sp/in__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ins</l>       <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>an</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inning</l>    <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/eal__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eal</l>       <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eal</l>       <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eals</l>      <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ole</l>       <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olen</l>      <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ealing</l>    <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="step__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ped</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ped</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ping</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tip__vblex"><e><par n="step__vblex"/></e></pardef>

<pardef n="st/ick__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ick</l>       <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ick</l>       <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>icks</l>      <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uck</l>       <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uck</l>       <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>icking</l>    <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sw/im__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ims</l>       <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>am</l>        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imming</l>    <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="t/each__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>each</l>      <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>each</l>      <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eachs</l>     <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aught</l>     <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aught</l>     <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eaching</l>   <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR">       <p><l>eaches</l>    <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="break">           <i>br</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cap">             <i>cap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chop">            <i>chop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="clap">            <i>clap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="clip">            <i>clip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cup">             <i>cup</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dip">             <i>dip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drip">            <i>drip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drop">            <i>drop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="equip">           <i>equip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flop">            <i>flop</i><par n="tip__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grip">            <i>grip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hop">             <i>hop</i><par n="tip__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kidnap">          <i>kidnap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lap">             <i>lap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lop">             <i>lop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="map">             <i>map</i><par n="tip__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mop">             <i>mop</i><par n="tip__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="outstrip">        <i>outstrip</i><par n="tip__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pop">             <i>pop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prep">            <i>prep</i><par n="tip__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prop">            <i>prop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rip">             <i>rip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sing">            <i>s</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="seek">            <i>s</i><par n="s/eek__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sink">            <i>s</i><par n="st/ink__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="scrap">           <i>scrap</i><par n="tip__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shear">           <i>sh</i><par n="sh/ear__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ship">            <i>ship</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shoe">            <i>sho</i><par n="sho/e__vblex"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="shop">                 <i>shop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shrink">          <i>shr</i><par n="st/ink__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sip">             <i>sip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skip">            <i>skip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sling">           <i>sl</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slide">           <i>slid</i><par n="slid/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slip">            <i>slip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="snap">            <i>snap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="speak">           <i>sp</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spin">            <i>sp</i><par n="sp/in__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spring">          <i>spr</i><par n="r/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="steal">           <i>st</i><par n="st/eal__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stick">           <i>st</i><par n="st/ick__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stink">           <i>st</i><par n="st/ink__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="step">            <i>step</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="step in">         <i>step</i><par n="step__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="step into">       <i>step</i><par n="step__vblex"/><p><l><b/>into</l><r><g><b/>into</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="stop">            <i>stop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="strap">           <i>strap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="strip">           <i>strip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="swim">            <i>sw</i><par n="sw/im__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="swap">            <i>swap</i><par n="tip__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="teach">           <i>t</i><par n="t/each__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tap">             <i>tap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tip">             <i>tip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="top">             <i>top</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trap">            <i>trap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trip">            <i>trip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="whip">            <i>whip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="worship">         <i>worship</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wrap">            <i>wrap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="zip">             <i>zip</i><par n="tip__vblex"/></e>
